New Jersey, session 221, A4711.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  a.  If a public institution of higher education rescinds or does not renew an athletic scholarship previously awarded by the institution to a student-athlete due to an incapacitating injury or illness, the institution shall provide the student-athlete with a scholarship equal in value to the athletic scholarship for the remainder of the students enrollment in an undergraduate degree program at the institution, or for a maximum of five academic years, inclusive of the duration of the athletic scholarship, whichever is shorter. b.  As used in this section: Incapacitating injury or illness means an injury or illness directly related to the student-athletes participation in intercollegiate athletics at a public institution of higher education that has been determined by the institutions medical staff to make the student-athlete medically ineligible to continue participation in intercollegiate athletics. Student-athlete means an undergraduate student who participates in intercollegiate athletics at a public institution of higher education. 2. This act shall take effect immediately.